Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. On September 3, 2025, the governor issued Executive Order 25-06 establishing Your Washington within the office of the governor to replace the former Results Washington. Under the executive order, cabinet agencies are required to develop and track metrics focused on delivering exceptional customer service to Washingtonians and to communicate successes, failures, opportunities for improvement, and solutions related to the customer experience. Cabinet agencies are also required to designate a Your Washington liaison and comply with assessment and reporting requirements. It is the intent of the legislature to require, through a pilot project, certain noncabinet agencies that have wide-ranging missions and responsibilities, have direct and expansive public engagement, or are responsible for delivering tangible public goods, among other direct public impacts, to meet the same requirements as those described in Executive Order 25-06 to expand the state's effort to improve the customer experience for Washington residents regardless of whether the executive order remains in effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The office of the secretary of state, the department of fish and wildlife, and the office of the insurance commissioner, shall implement sections 3 through 6 of this act as a pilot project.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Covered agencies described in section 2 of this act shall:(1) In collaboration with Your Washington, established in Executive Order 25-06, develop and track metrics focused on delivering exceptional customer service and communicate successes, failures, opportunities for improvement, and solutions related to the customer experience;(2) By July 10, 2026, designate a Your Washington liaison with decision-making authority and accountability for:(a) Partnering with Your Washington to ensure enterprise-wide coordination;(b) Aligning agency service improvements with enterprise customer experience and accessibility priorities;(c) Submitting quarterly customer experience performance data to Your Washington; and(d) Ensuring customer feedback is incorporated into service improvements and digital accessibility enhancements;(3) Work in partnership with Washington technology solutions and Your Washington to ensure its customer service delivery channels meet enterprise accessibility, usability, and customer experience best practices and prioritize digital-first services; and(4) By September 8, 2026, provide Your Washington a documented process and workflow map and timeline of each step of the customer experience for the key services provided by the covered agency, describing any existing customer experience data for each step of the customer experience.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) By October 8, 2026, covered agencies described in section 2 of this act shall provide Your Washington, in the form and manner mutually agreed upon with Your Washington, a report detailing:(a) Customer experience metrics, meaning any existing data related to the agency's delivery of customer services such as the data tied to each step of delivering public services, including timelines, communication, and outcomes. Data described in this section does not include the personally identifiable information of individual resident service users or customers, or information deemed confidential or exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW or other law;(b) Information about customer feedback and complaints including a description of any methods used to collect and report on customer feedback and complaints, and a summary of the most common customer complaints regarding the covered agency's customer service;(c) A description of the covered agency's delivery of digital and in-person services, and identification of areas for improvement; and(d) Policies or practices in place to incorporate or strengthen plain language writing and design principles and practices, including the extent to which the covered agency's policies or practices align with Executive Order 23-02 requiring the use of plain language.(2) Beginning April 1, 2026, covered agencies shall notify Your Washington at the beginning and end of any pilot projects expected to improve customer experience, including the goals and expected outcomes of the pilot project and its results.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) By December 7, 2026, and in coordination with Your Washington created under Executive Order 25-06, covered agencies described in section 2 of this act shall develop and begin implementing a customer experience improvement plan, following a format mutually agreed upon with Your Washington, that includes:(a) Metrics for measuring customer experience and customer satisfaction, and timelines for regularly tracking and reporting on the same;(b) Staff training plans focused on delivering exceptional customer service and using plain language consistent with state guidelines; and(c) A proposal, including its timeline for implementation, for improving the customer experience for key services provided by the agency such as reducing steps, shortening timelines, increasing digital self-service, and simplifying applications or making them more accessible.(2) Each covered agency shall incorporate the customer experience improvement plan developed under subsection (1) of this section into its strategic plan and prioritize agency efforts to improve its customer service in areas where its services are most critical to the public.(3) After initial plans are developed and implemented, covered agencies shall, in collaboration with Your Washington, update their customer experience improvement plan as part of their strategic planning process on an ongoing basis. Your Washington may recommend and encourage specific actions when it determines that an agency's progress requires improvement to meet customer needs.(4) Beginning March 7, 2027, and every three months thereafter until March 8, 2029, covered agencies shall provide a quarterly progress report to Your Washington, detailing the status of its implementation of their customer experience improvement plan. By March 31, 2029, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, Your Washington shall compile the quarterly progress reports and provide an executive summary to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature detailing the progress made under agency plans including identification of agencies that have made the most progress each year, identification of agencies most in need of improvement in customer experience, and recommendations on best practices agencies may implement to improve customer experience.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. As soon as practicable, covered agencies described in section 2 of this act shall begin partnering with Washington technology solutions to move towards a "one front door" vision of state digital services accessible in a single place. All covered agency websites and digital applications should prominently display a standardized navigational component that provides a clear pathway to WA.gov, and covered agencies shall collaborate with Washington technology solutions to develop a schedule for integrating their digital applications with WA.gov.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. (1) Your Washington may contract with a neutral third party to evaluate person-centered design and customer experience measures in covered agencies described under section 2 of this act.(2) Consistent with section 4(1)(a) of this act, Your Washington must work with covered agencies under section 2 of this act to ensure that metrics are disaggregated to the extent possible, and to the extent consistent with applicable law and the public policy of this state, to measure the experiences of different groups of people and to identify and eliminate bias and discrimination in the delivery of state programs and services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. This act expires April 1, 2029.--- END ---